Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
TRESPASS TO VESSEL

[§200-61] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Enforcement officer" means a police
officer and any other state or county officer charged with the enforcement of
state laws.

"Vessel" means every description of
watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

"Waters of the State" means any
waters within the jurisdiction of the State, the marginal seas adjacent to the
State, and the high seas when navigated as part of a journey or ride to or from
the shores of the State. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next